Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.660

[Art. 85] Desertion.

(1) Any member of the organized militia who:

(a) Without authority goes or remains absent from the member's unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away therefrom permanently;

(b) Quits the member's unit, organization or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

(c) Without being regularly separated from one of the organized militia enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the organized militia, or in one of the armed forces of the United States, without fully disclosing the fact that he or she has not been regularly separated;

is guilty of desertion.

(2) Any commissioned officer of the organized militia who, after tender of a resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his or her post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently is guilty of desertion.

(3) Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 63; 1963 c 220 s 84.]